Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) As  used in this section, “telehealth” means a variety of methods, through
the use of electronic and telecommunications technologies, for the distance delivery of health
care services, including dental care services, and clinical information  designed to improve a
patient’s health status and to enhance  delivery of the health care services and clinical in-
formation.
(2) A dental care provider authorized by  the Oregon Board of Dentistry to practice dental
care services may use telehealth if:
(a) In the professional judgment  of the dental care provider, the use of telehealth is an
appropriate manner in which to provide a dental care service; and
(b) The dental care provider is providing a dental care service that is  within the scope
of practice of the dental care provider.
(3) The use of telehealth as described in subsection (2) of this section is not  an expansion
of the scope of practice of a dental care provider.
(4) The board shall treat a dental care service that is  delivered by a dental care provider
through telehealth as described in subsection (2) of this section the same as  the board treats
the dental care service when delivered in person. The board shall apply identical quality and
practice standards to a particular dental care service  regardless of the method of delivery
of the dental care service.
Enrolled Senate Bill 786 (SB 786-A) Page 1
Passed by Senate April 12, 2017
..................................................................................
Lori L. Brocker, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Passed by House May 31, 2017
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
..................................................................................
Dennis Richardson, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 786 (SB 786-A) Page 2